North Carolina statutes. Chapter 168. Persons with Disabilities.
Article 2. Vocational Rehabilitation.

§ 168-14.
Vocational rehabilitation services for deaf persons.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall promote the employment of deaf persons in this State. The Department shall assist deaf persons whose disability limits employment opportunities in obtaining gainful employment commensurate with their abilities and in maintaining such employment.

The Department, in furtherance of these objectives, shall maintain statistics regarding trades and occupations in which deaf persons are employed.

The Department shall attempt to employ deaf persons in its vocational rehabilitation services for deaf persons and shall have at least one deaf person so employed.

History.

1975, c. 412, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§§ 168-15 through 168-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.